Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3842
(UTC 416) Modification to achieve settlor's tax objectives.

(UTC 416) To achieve the settlor's tax objectives, the court may modify the terms of a trust in a manner that is not contrary to the settlor's probable intention. The court may provide that the modification has retroactive effect.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 42.